California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
 receive notifications pursuant to this subdivision, of unusual incidents concerning a ward placed by the sending county that involved a response by local law enforcement or emergency services personnel, including runaway incidents. The notification shall include identifying information about the ward. A group home facility shall notify the designated probation official of a requesting probation department of an unusual incident no later than the applicable deadline imposed by law or department regulation for a group home facility to notify the licensing agency of the unusual incident. The requesting probation department shall maintain the confidentiality of any identifying information about the ward contained in the notification and shall not share, transfer, or otherwise release the identifying information to a third party unless otherwise authorized by state or federal law.

(d) A minor, the parent or guardian of a minor, and counsel
 representing a minor or the parent or guardian of a minor may petition the juvenile court for the review of a placement decision concerning the minor made by the probation officer pursuant to subdivision (a). The petition shall state the petitioner’s relationship to the minor and shall set forth in concise language the grounds on which the review is sought. The court shall order that a hearing shall be held on the petition and shall give prior notice, or cause prior notice to be given, to the persons and by the means prescribed by Section 776, and, in instances in which the means of giving notice is not prescribed by that section, then by any means as the court prescribes.

(e) If a minor is placed in a community care facility out of his or her county of residence and is then arrested and placed in juvenile hall pending a jurisdictional hearing, the county of residence shall pay to the probation department of the county of placement all
 reasonable costs resulting directly from the minor’s stay in the juvenile hall, provided that these costs exceed one hundred dollars ($100).

(f) If, as a result of the hearing in subdivision (d), the minor is remanded back to his or her county of residence, the county of residence shall pay to the probation department of the county of placement, in addition to any payment made pursuant to subdivision (e), all reasonable costs resulting directly from transporting the minor to the county of residency, provided that these costs exceed one hundred dollars ($100).

(g) Claims made by the probation department in the county of placement to the county of residence, pursuant to subdivisions (e) and (f), shall be paid within 30 days of the submission of these claims and the probation department in the county of placement shall bear the remaining expense.

(h) As used in this section:

(1) “Community care facility” shall be defined as provided in Section 1502 of the Health and Safety Code.

(2) “Gang affiliation” shall have the same meaning as defined for data entry into the CalGang system.

(3) “Group home” has the same meaning as provided in paragraph (1) of subdivision (g) of Section 80001 of Title 22 of the California Code of Regulations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 46, Sec. 4.   (SB 352)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

740.1.

(a) Any minor adjudged to be a ward of the court on the basis that he or she is a person described in Section 602 of the Welfare and Institutions Code and who is placed in a community care facility outside his or her county of residence who is then arrested and after receiving a jurisdictional hearing is remanded back to his or her county of residence shall not be placed back into the placement county without the testimony and documentation or request, if any, from the placement county pursuant to subdivision (b).

(b) The placement county may provide to the juvenile court relevant testimony and documentation pertaining to the ward’s conduct while residing in the placement county, and may request that the ward not be returned to the placement county.

(c) “Community care facility,” as used in this section, shall be defined as provided in Section 1502 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1153, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

741.

The juvenile court may, in any case before it in which a petition has been filed as provided in Article 16 (commencing with Section 650), order that the probation officer obtain the services of such psychiatrists, psychologists, physicians and surgeons, dentists, optometrists, audiologists, or other clinical experts as may be required to assist in determining the appropriate treatment of the minor and as may be required in the conduct or implementation of the treatment. Payment for the services shall be a charge against the county.

Whenever diagnosis or treatment pursuant to this section is due to, or related to, drug or alcohol use, the cost thereof shall be considered for the use of funds made available to the county from state or federal sources for the purpose of providing care and treatment for drug- and alcohol-related illness or for drug or alcohol abuse.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 482, Sec. 3.   Effective October 4, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

742.

(a) Upon the request of an alleged victim of a crime, the probation officer shall, within 60 days of the final disposition of a case within which a petition has been filed pursuant to Section 602, inform that person by letter of the final disposition of the case. “Final disposition” means dismissal, acquittal, or findings made pursuant to this article. If the court orders that restitution shall be made to the victim of a crime, the amount, terms, and conditions thereof shall be included in the information provided pursuant to this section.

(b) When
 a petition has been filed pursuant to Section 602, the probation officer shall inform the victim of the offense, if any, of any
 victim impact class available in the county, and of their right pursuant to subdivision (a) to be informed of the final disposition of the case, including their right, if any, to victim restitution, as permitted by law.

(c) A victim shall be notified of the availability of community-based restorative justice programs and processes available to them, including, but not limited to, programs serving their community, county, county jails, juvenile
 detention facilities, and the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation. The victim shall be notified as early and often as possible, including, but not limited to, during the initial contact, during followup investigation, at the point of diversion, throughout the process of the case, and in all postconviction proceedings.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 513, Sec. 4.   (AB 60)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 18.5. Graffiti Removal and Damage Recovery Program [742.10. - 742.22.]

742.10.

It is the intent of the Legislature in enacting this article to accomplish the following purposes:

(a) To assist public and private owners and possessors of property defaced by minors with graffiti or other inscribed material to recover their full damages.

(b) To safeguard the fiscal integrity of cities and counties that expend public funds to remove graffiti and other material inscribed by minors from public or private property, or to repair or replace public or private property defaced by minors with graffiti or other inscribed material, by enabling those cities and counties to recoup the full costs of that removal, repair, and replacement.

(c) To safeguard the fiscal integrity of cities and counties by enabling them to recoup the law enforcement costs of identifying and apprehending minors who deface the property of others with graffiti or other inscribed material.

(d) To minimize the costs of collecting those costs and damages.

(e) To discourage the inscription of graffiti and other material by minors by requiring the offending minors, and their parents who have the financial ability to do so, to bear the costs associated with the unlawful defacement of property with graffiti or other inscribed material.

(f) To retain in the juvenile court the discretion needed to accomplish the goal of rehabilitating minors.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 909, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

742.12.

(a) As used in this article, the term “graffiti or other inscribed material” includes any unauthorized inscription, word, figure, mark, or design that is written, marked, etched, scratched, drawn, or painted on real or personal property.

(b) As used in subdivision (d) of Section 742.16, the word “custody” means either legal custody or physical custody of a minor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 909, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

742.14.

(a) A city, county, or city and county may elect, by ordinance, to have the probation officer of the county recoup for it, through juvenile court proceedings in accordance with Section 742.16, its costs associated with defacement by minors of its property and the property of others by graffiti or other inscribed material. That ordinance shall include the cost finding or findings specified in subdivision (b), and if the city, county, or city and county enacts an ordinance pursuant to Section 53069.3 of the Government Code, the cost findings specified in subdivision (c). These cost findings shall be reviewed at least once every three years, at which time the city, county, or city and county, by resolution, shall adopt updated cost findings in accordance with subdivisions (b) and (c). A city, county, or city and county may rescind, by ordinance, its election to have the probation officer recoup its costs pursuant to this section. Immediately after adoption, the city or county shall cause a certified copy of an ordinance adopted pursuant to this subdivision and any resolution containing updated cost findings to be forwarded to the clerk of the juvenile court in the county and to the probation officer of the county.

(b) A city, county, or city and county that adopts an ordinance pursuant to subdivision (a) shall include therein a finding or findings, to be reviewed at least once every three years, of the average costs per unit of measure incurred by the law enforcement agency with primary jurisdiction in the city, county, or city and county in identifying and apprehending a person subsequently convicted of violation of Section 594, 594.3, 594.4, 640.5, 640.6, or 640.7 of the Penal Code or a minor subsequently found to be a person described in Section 602 by reason of the commission of an act prohibited by Section 594, 594.3, 594.4, 640.5, 640.6, or 640.7 of the Penal Code. A city, county, or city and county that does not adopt an ordinance pursuant to subdivision (a) may adopt an ordinance containing the cost finding or findings described in this subdivision. Findings of costs per unit of measure may include, but are not limited to, findings of the hourly costs of employee time and of the costs per mile of operating patrol vehicles.

(c) If a city, county, or city and county enacts an ordinance pursuant to Section 53069.3 of the Government Code and enacts an ordinance pursuant to subdivision (a), the ordinance enacted pursuant to subdivision (a) shall contain findings, to be reviewed at least once every three years, of the average cost to the city, county, or city and county per unit of measure of removing graffiti and other inscribed material, and of repairing and replacing property of the types frequently defaced with graffiti or other inscribed material that cannot be removed cost effectively. A city, county, or city and county that does not adopt an ordinance pursuant to subdivision (a) may adopt an ordinance containing the cost findings described in this subdivision. Findings of costs per unit of measure may include, but are not limited to, findings of the costs per square inch of removing painted graffiti or of the costs per item of replacing items that have been etched.

(d) A school district, district, or other local public agency may elect, by formal action of its governing body, to have the probation officer of the county recoup for it, through juvenile court proceedings in accordance with Section 742.16, its costs associated with the defacement by minors of property it owns or possesses by graffiti or other inscribed material. Upon election, the school district, district, or other local public agency shall make the cost findings described in subdivision (c). These cost findings shall be reviewed at least once every three years, at which time the school district, district, or other local public agency, by formal action of its governing body, shall adopt updated cost findings in accordance with subdivision (c). A school district, district, or other local public agency may rescind, by resolution, its election to have the probation officer recoup its costs pursuant to this section. Immediately after making the election described in this subdivision and adopting initial or updated cost findings, and immediately after rescinding said election, the school district, district, or other local public agency shall cause a certified copy of a document memorializing the election, rescission, or cost findings to be forwarded to the clerk of the juvenile court in the county and to the probation officer of the county. A school district, district, or other local public agency that does not elect to have the probation officer of the county recoup its costs pursuant to Section 742.16 may adopt the cost findings described in this subdivision.

(e) A city, county, or city and county that has elected to have the probation officer of the county recoup its costs pursuant to Section 742.16 shall transmit to the probation officer, forthwith, data about its expenditure of resources in identifying and apprehending any minor about whom a petition is filed alleging that the minor is a person described by Section 602 by reason of the commission of an act prohibited by Section 594, 594.3, 594.4, 640.5, 640.6, or 640.7 of the Penal Code. That data shall be sufficient to enable the probation officer and the juvenile court to calculate the costs to the city, county, or city and county in identifying and apprehending the minor.

(f) A city, county, or other public agency that has elected to have the probation officer of the county recoup its costs pursuant to Section 742.16 and that has made cost findings pursuant to subdivisions (c) or (d) shall transmit to the probation officer, forthwith, data about its expenditure of resources to remove graffiti or other material inscribed by, or to repair or replace property defaced by, any minor about whom a petition is filed alleging that the minor is a person described by Section 602 by reason of the commission of an act prohibited by Section 594, 594.3, 594.4, 640.5, 640.6, or 640.7 of the Penal Code. That data shall be sufficient to enable the probation officer and the juvenile court to calculate the costs to the city, county, or other local agency for that removal, repair, or replacement.

(g) The probation officer of a county may establish procedures for collecting the data described in subdivision (e) and (f). These procedures may include a provision that the juvenile court may not award and the probation officer may refuse to collect costs described in this section unless the data required to be provided to the probation officer pursuant to subdivisions (e) and (f) is provided to him or her within a time certain after he or she makes a demand therefor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 909, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

742.16.

(a) If a minor is found to be a person described in Section 602 of this code by reason of the commission of an act prohibited by Section 594, 594.3, 594.4, 640.5, 640.6, or 640.7 of the Penal Code, and the court does not remove the minor from the physical custody of the parent or guardian, the court as a condition of probation, except in any case in which the court makes a finding and states on the record its reasons why that condition would be inappropriate, may require the minor to wash, paint, repair, or replace the property defaced, damaged, or destroyed by the minor or otherwise pay restitution to the probation officer of the county for disbursement to the owner or possessor of the property or both. In any case in which the minor is not
 granted probation or in which the minor’s cleanup, repair, or replacement of the property will not return the property to its condition before it was defaced, damaged, or destroyed, the court shall make a finding of the amount of restitution that would be required to fully compensate the owner and possessor of the property for their damages. The court may order the minor or the minor’s estate to pay that restitution to the probation officer of the county for disbursement to the owner or possessor of the property or both, only if the court determines that the minor or the minor’s estate has the ability to do so, except in any case in which the court makes a finding and states on the record its reasons why full restitution would be inappropriate. If full restitution is found to be inappropriate, the court may require the minor to perform specified community service, except in any case in which the
 court makes a finding and states on the record its reasons why that condition would be inappropriate.

(b) If a minor is found to be a person described in Section 602 of this code by reason of the commission of an act prohibited by Section 594, 594.3, 594.4, 640.5, 640.6, or 640.7 of the Penal Code, and the graffiti or other material inscribed by the minor has been removed, or the property defaced by the minor has been repaired or replaced by a public entity that has elected, pursuant to Section 742.14, to have the probation officer of the county recoup its costs through proceedings in accordance with this section and has made cost findings in accordance with subdivision (c) or (d) of Section 742.14, the court shall determine the total cost incurred by the public entity for said removal, repair, or replacement, using, if applicable, the
 cost findings most recently adopted by the public entity pursuant to subdivision (c) or (d) of Section 742.14. The court may order the minor or the minor’s estate to pay those costs to the probation officer of the county only if the court determines that the minor or the minor’s estate has the ability to do so.

(c) If the minor is found to be a person described in Section 602 of this code by reason of the commission of an act prohibited by Section 594, 594.3, 594.4, 640.5, 640.6, or 640.7 of the Penal Code, and the minor was identified or apprehended by the law enforcement agency of a city or county that has elected, pursuant to Section 742.14, to have the probation officer of the county recoup its costs through proceedings in accordance with this section, the court shall determine the cost of identifying or apprehending the minor, or
 both, using, if applicable, the cost findings adopted by the city or county pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 742.14. The court may order the minor or the minor’s estate to pay those costs to the probation officer of the county only if the court determines that the minor or the minor’s estate has the ability to do so.

(d) If the court determines that the minor or the minor’s estate is unable to pay in full the costs and damages determined pursuant to subdivisions (a), (b), and (c), and if the minor’s parent or parents have been cited into court pursuant to Section 742.18, the court shall hold a hearing to determine the liability of the minor’s parent or parents pursuant to Section 1714.1 of the Civil Code for those costs and damages. Except when the court makes a finding setting forth unusual circumstances in which parental liability
 would not serve the interests of justice, the court may order the minor’s parent or parents to pay those costs and damages to the probation officer of the county only if the court determines that the parent or parents have the ability to pay, if the minor was in the custody or control of the parent or parents at the time the minor committed the act that forms the basis for the finding that the minor is a person described in Section 602. In evaluating the parent’s or parents’ ability to pay, the court shall take into consideration the family income, the necessary obligations of the family, and the number of persons dependent upon this income.

(e) The hearing described in subdivision (d) may be held immediately following the disposition hearing or at a later date, at the option of the court.

(f) If the amount of costs and damages sought to be recovered in the hearing pursuant to subdivision (d) is five thousand dollars ($5,000) or less, the parent or parents may not be represented by counsel and the probation officer of the county shall be represented by a nonattorney designee. The court shall conduct that hearing in accordance with Sections 116.510 and 116.520 of the Code of Civil Procedure. Notwithstanding the foregoing, if the court determines that a parent cannot properly present their defense, the court may, in its discretion, allow another individual to assist that parent. In addition, a spouse may appear and participate in the hearing on behalf of their spouse if the representative’s spouse has given consent and the court determines that the interest of justice would be served thereby.

(g) If the amount of
 costs and damages sought to be recovered in the hearing pursuant to subdivision (d) exceeds five thousand dollars ($5,000), the parent or parents may be represented by counsel of their own choosing, and the probation officer of the county shall be represented by the district attorney or an attorney or nonattorney designee of the probation officer. The parent or parents shall not be entitled to court-appointed counsel or to counsel compensated at public expense.

(h) At the hearing conducted pursuant to subdivision (d), there shall be a presumption affecting the burden of proof that the findings of the court made pursuant to subdivisions (a), (b), and (c) represent the actual damages and costs attributable to the act of the minor that forms the basis of the finding that the minor is a person described in Section 602.

(i) If the parent or parents, after having been cited to appear pursuant to Section 742.18, fail to appear as ordered, the court shall order the parent or parents to pay the full amount of the costs and damages determined by the court pursuant to subdivisions (a), (b), and (c).

(j) Execution may be issued on an order issued by the court pursuant to this section in the same manner as on a judgment in a civil action, including any balance unpaid at the termination of the court’s jurisdiction over the minor.

(k) At any time prior to the satisfaction of a judgment entered pursuant to this section, a person against whom the judgment was entered may petition the rendering court to modify or vacate the judgment on the showing
 of a change in circumstances relating to the person’s ability to pay the judgment.

(l) For purposes of a hearing conducted pursuant to subdivision (d), the judge of the juvenile court shall have the jurisdiction of a judge of the superior court in a limited civil case, and if the amount of the demand is within the jurisdictional limits stated in Sections 116.220 and 116.221 of the Code of Civil Procedure, the judge of the juvenile court shall have the powers of a judge presiding over the small claims court.

(m) Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit the authority of a juvenile court to provide conditions of probation.

(n) The options available to the court pursuant to subdivisions (a), (b), (c), (d),
 and (k), to order payment by the minor and the minor’s parent or parents of less than the full costs described in subdivisions (a), (b), and (c), on grounds of financial inability or for reasons of justice, shall not be available to a superior court in an ordinary civil proceeding pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 1714.1 of the Civil Code, except that in any proceeding pursuant to either subdivision (b) of Section 1714.1 of the Civil Code or this section, the maximum amount that a parent or a minor may be ordered to pay shall not exceed twenty thousand dollars ($20,000) for each tort of the minor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 575, Sec. 10.   (AB 1376)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

742.18.

(a) If the petition alleges that the minor is the person described by Section 602 by reason of the commission of an act prohibited by Section 594, 594.3, 594.4, 640.5, 640.6, or 640.7 of the Penal Code, and the petition is sustained, the court, in addition to the notice provided in Sections 658 and 659, shall issue a citation to the minor’s parent or legal guardian, ordering them to appear in the court at the time and date stated for a hearing pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 742.16.

(b) The citation shall notify the parent or legal guardian that at the hearing, he, she, or they may be ordered to pay restitution sufficient to fully compensate the owner and possessor of the property defaced by the minor for the damage caused by that defacement, the law enforcement costs of identifying and apprehending the minor, if applicable, and the costs incurred by a public entity to remove graffiti or other material inscribed by the minor, or to repair or replace the property defaced by the minor, if applicable. The citation shall set forth the provisions of Section 742.16 and shall advise the parent or parents that he, she, or they may be ordered to pay an amount not exceeding twenty thousand dollars ($20,000) for the above-referenced damages and costs. The citation shall contain a warning to the parent or parents that if he, she, or they fail to appear at the time and date stated, the court will order him, her, or them to pay in full the costs and damages caused by the act of the minor.

(c) Service of the citation shall be made on all parents or legal guardians of the minor whose names and addresses are known to the petitioner.

(d) Service of the citation shall be made at least 10 days prior to the time and date stated therein for appearance, in the manner provided by law for the service of a summons in a civil action, other than by publication.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 909, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

742.20.

Any moneys collected by the probation officer of the county pursuant to an order rendered pursuant to Section 742.16 shall be distributed by the county to the following persons and entities in the following priority:

(a) Restitution to the owner and possessor of the property defaced by the minor, in the amount determined by the court.

(b) After the restitution described in subdivision (a) has been paid in full, or if restitution was not ordered, the costs of removing graffiti or other material inscribed by the minor and of repairing or replacing property defaced by the minor, to the city, county, or other local public agency that incurred those costs, except that the county may deduct and retain 15 percent of the amount collected for the removal, repair, or replacement costs, or an amount equivalent to its actual costs of collection, whichever is less.

(c) After the costs and damages described in subdivisions (a) and (b) have been paid in full, or if there are no costs or damages, the law enforcement costs of identifying and apprehending the minor, to the city or county that incurred those costs, except that the county may deduct and retain 15 percent of the amount collected for those law enforcement costs, or an amount equivalent to its actual costs of collection, whichever is less.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 909, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

742.22.

If any provision or clause of this article or the application thereof to any person or circumstances is held invalid, the invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of this article which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this article are severable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 909, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 18.6. Repeat Offender Prevention Project [743. - 749.]

743.

Contingent upon the appropriation of funds therefor, there is hereby established a three-year pilot project which shall be known as the “Repeat Offender Prevention Project.” This project shall operate in the Counties of Fresno, Humboldt, Los Angeles, Orange, San Diego, San Mateo, and Solano, and the City and County of San Francisco, unless the board of supervisors of one or more of these counties adopts a resolution to the effect it will not participate in the project, each of which shall either design, establish, implement, and evaluate a model program to meet the needs of a juvenile offender population identified as having the potential to become repeat serious offenders utilizing the findings of exploratory studies conducted in Orange County between 1989 and 1993 by the research staff of the Orange County Probation Department and which identified certain minors who were designated as the “8 percent” population. The main goal of this program is to develop and implement a cost-effective multiagency, multidisciplinary program which targets youth displaying behavior that may lead to delinquency and recidivism.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 327, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

744.

(a) The Repeat Offender Prevention Project shall be administered by the Board of Corrections and each program shall be under the onsite administration of the chief probation officer in the county selected for participation in the project or under a consortium of chief probation officers representing each participating county.

(b) Pursuant to this article, a chief probation officer or the regional consortium, with the approval of the appropriate board or boards of supervisors, may apply to the Board of Corrections for funding to implement a program meeting the criteria specified in subdivision (b) of Section 745. The goal of each program shall be to develop and demonstrate intervention strategies which will end each participating minor’s escalating pattern of criminal and antisocial behavior, a pattern that leads to chronic delinquency and, potentially, to adult criminal careers. These strategies shall be provided within the parameters of community protection and offender accountability. Application for program funding shall be made in accordance with written guidelines established by the Board of Corrections in consultation with chief probation officers throughout the state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 327, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

745.

The Board of Corrections shall establish goals and deadlines against which the success or failure of the program demonstration projects may be measured. The board shall also develop selection criteria and funding schedules for participating counties which shall take into consideration, but not be limited to, all of the following:

(1) Size of the eligible target population as defined in Section 746.

(2) Demonstrated ability to administer the program.

(3) Identification of service delivery area.

(4) Demonstrated ability to provide or develop the key intervention strategies described in Section 748 to the eligible target population and their families.

(5) A formal research component utilizing an experimental research design and random assignment to the program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 327, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

746.

A minor shall be selected for participation in a program established pursuant to this article based upon the following factors:

(a) The minor is 1512 years of age or younger, has been declared a ward of the juvenile court for the first time and is to be supervised by a probation department selected for participation in this project.

(b) The minor has been evaluated and found to have at least three of the following factors, that place the minor at a significantly greater risk of becoming a chronic juvenile or adult offender:

(1) School behavior and performance problems. This shall include at least one of the following: attendance problems; school suspension or expulsion; or failure in two or more academic classes during the previous six months or comparable academic period.

(2) Family problems. These shall include at least one of the following: poor parental supervision or control; documented circumstances of domestic violence; child abuse or neglect; or family members who have engaged in criminal activities.

(3) Substance abuse. This shall include any regular use of alcohol or drugs by the minor, other than experimentation.

(4) High-risk predelinquent behavior. This shall include at least one of the following: a pattern of stealing; chronic running away from home; or gang membership or association.

(5) The minor matches the at-risk profile for becoming a chronic and repeat juvenile offender according to the criteria developed by the Multi-Agency At-Risk Youth Committee (MAARYC).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 327, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

747.

The Board of Corrections shall adopt written minimum standards for project implementation, operation, and evaluation which shall include a written commitment by a county or region to the following objectives:

(a) Teamwork on the part of all treatment and intervention agents involved in the project including the family, the professionals, and any community volunteers.

(b) Empowerment of the family to recognize and, ultimately, to solve the problems related to their minor’s delinquent behavior and their involvement as an integral part of the treatment team and process.

(c) Creation of a multiagency, multidisciplinary, and culturally competent team so that the program can effectively draw on the professional knowledge, skill, and experience of many treatment disciplines in areas including, but not limited to, the following: education; job preparation and search; job skills and vocational training; life skills; psychological counseling; mental health services; drug and alcohol treatment; health care; parenting skills; community service opportunities; building self-esteem and self-confidence; mentoring programs; restitution programs; gang intervention; crime prevention; recreational, social, and cultural activities; and transportation and child care as needed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 327, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

748.

Each county or region shall, in implementing their respective programs, provide the following key intervention strategies to ensure the following:

(a) Adequate levels of supervision, structure, and support to minors and their families both during and after the intervention and treatment process, in order to accomplish the following:

(1) Ensure protection of the community, the minor, and his or her family.

(2) Facilitate the development of new patterns of thinking and behavior.

(3) Eliminate any obvious stumbling blocks to the family’s progress.

(4) Facilitate the development of enhanced parenting skills and parent-child relationships.

(b) Accountability on the part of the minor for his or her actions and assistance to the minor in developing a greater awareness and sensitivity to the impact of his or her actions on both people and situations.

(c) Assistance to families in their efforts to ensure that minors are attending school regularly.

(d) Assistance to the minor in developing strategies for attaining and reinforcing educational success.

(e) Promotion and development of positive social values, behavior, and relationships by providing opportunities for the minor to directly help people; to improve his or her community; to participate in positive leisure-time activities specially chosen to match his or her individual interests, skills, and abilities; and to have greater access and exposure to positive adult and juvenile role models.

(f) Promotion of partnerships between public and private agencies to develop individualized intervention strategies which shall include, but not be limited to, the following:

(1) Delivery of services in close proximity to the minor’s or the minor’s family’s home.

(2) Community case advocates to assist in building bridges of trust, communication, and understanding between the minor, the family, and all treatment and intervention agents.

(g) Provision of a continuum of care with strong followup services that continue to be available to the minor and family as long as needed, not just on a crisis basis.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 327, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

749.

(a) The Board of Corrections shall be responsible for monitoring demonstration project and expansion program implementations in accordance with an annual program plan submitted by the participating counties or regions. Written progress and evaluation reports shall be required of all participating counties pursuant to a schedule and guidelines developed by the Board of Corrections.

(b) The success of each funded demonstration project shall be determined, at a minimum, by comparing a control group, consisting of juvenile offenders who were not selected for participation in the project, to an experimental group, consisting of juvenile offenders who have participated in the project. Juveniles in each group shall be evaluated at 6-, 12-, 18-, and 24-month intervals, according to the following criteria:

(1) The number of subsequent petitions to declare the minor a ward of the juvenile court, pursuant to Section 602, and the subject matter and disposition of each of those petitions.

(2) The number of days served in any local or state correctional facilities.

(3) The number of days of school attendance during the current or most recent semester.

(4) The minor’s grade point average for the most recently completed school semester.

(c) The Board of Corrections, based on reports provided pursuant to subdivision (a), shall report upon request to the Legislature on the effectiveness of these programs in achieving the demonstration project and program goals described in this article.

(d) The Board of Corrections shall determine county or regional eligibility for funding and, from money appropriated therefor, the board shall allocate and award funds to those counties or regions applying and eligible therefor and selected for project participation.

(e) The Repeat Offender Prevention Project shall be implemented within six months of the appropriation of funds therefor and shall terminate at the end of three years from that appropriation.

(f) Five percent of the funds allocated each fiscal year for the Repeat Offender Prevention Project shall be set aside for the administrative expenses of the Board of Corrections.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 327, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 18.7. Juvenile Crime Enforcement and Accountability Challenge Grant Program [749.2. - 749.27.]

749.2.
